Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 743B.280 to
743B.285.
SECTION 2. (1) An insurer offering a health benefit plan as defined in ORS  743B.005 shall
credit any amount an enrollee pays directly to a health care  provider to the enrollee’s
deductible and annual out-of-pocket expenses if:
(a) The health care item or service is medically necessary and covered under  the
enrollee’s health benefit plan;
(b) The enrollee does not submit the claim to the insurer; and
(c) The amount paid to the health care provider is less than  the average discounted rate
for the item or service paid to an in-network health care provider with the same license.
(2) An insurer shall:
(a) Establish a process  for an enrollee to submit a claim for the credit described in sub-
section (1) of this section, including the necessary documentation the enrollee  is required to
submit in support of the claim; or
(b) Require an enrollee to utilize the system the insurer uses  to process and adjudicate
claims to submit a claim for the credit described in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) Notwithstanding ORS 750.055 (1)(i), this section does  not apply to a health mainte-
nance organization as defined in ORS 750.005.
SECTION 3.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act applies  to a health benefit plan issued, renewed
or extended on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
Enrolled House Bill 2540 (HB 2540-A) Page 1
Passed by House March 17, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 13, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2540 (HB 2540-A) Page 2